South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3060.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 23, Title 17 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 17-23-168.     After a preliminary hearing, if the charge or charges against a defendant are dismissed or nol prossed and the defendant is subsequently indicted by a local or state grand jury on the original or substantially similar charge or charges and an arrest warrant is sought, the court must issue a courtesy summons. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----